Wyoming, session 2026, HB0028.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-4-303(a)(iii) is amended to read:
6-4-303. Sexual exploitation of children; penalties;
definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(iii) "Explicit sexual conduct" means actual or
simulated sexual intercourse, including genital-genital,
oral-genital, anal-genital or oral-anal, between persons of
the same or opposite sex, bestiality, masturbation,
sadistic or masochistic abuse or lascivious exhibition of
the genitals or pubic area of any person or the chest or
breasts of a female person;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0028
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2